Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 4 Municipal Gas Authority of Georgia
46-4-98.
Public purpose; tax exemption; payments in lieu of taxes.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity performing an essential governmental function.

The property of the authority is declared, and shall in all respects be considered, to be public property. Title to the authority’s property shall be held by the authority only for the benefit of the public; and the use of such property pursuant to this article shall be and is declared to be for essential public and governmental purposes, that is, for the promotion of public general welfare in the matter of providing an adequate, dependable, and economical gas supply in an effort to better the general condition of society in this state, which promotion is declared to be a public beneficence for the good of humanity and for the general improvement and happiness of society.

It is recognized, however, that removal from local tax digests of the value of all property owned by the authority might impose an unfair burden on many taxpayers whose property is taxable. In the interest of weighing these benefits and concerns and arriving at an equitable policy regarding treatment of authority property, the General Assembly finds and declares that equity requires that the authority should rightfully make payments in lieu of taxes so that the authority may fulfill its good and public purposes without incidental harm to the state’s local governments.

The authority shall make payments in lieu of taxes on its tangible property as provided in this Code section. It shall file a return within the same time and in the same form and manner as public utilities. The taxing authorities shall assess the tangible property of the authority which is made subject by this Code section to payments in lieu of taxes in accordance with the law and procedures applicable to public utilities and shall apply to such assessments in each year in which any such payments are due the appropriate millage levies of the state and of the political subdivisions in which such property is located in order to arrive at the amounts of the respective payments in lieu of taxes. The authority shall be notified of the amounts of the payments in lieu of taxes due and shall pay such amounts to the state and its respective political subdivisions within the time in which payments of taxes by public utilities are allowed or required.

Except as specifically provided for in this Code section for payments in lieu of taxes, all property of the authority, all income, obligations, and interest on the bonds and notes of the authority, and all transfers of such property, bonds, or notes shall be and are declared to be exempt from taxation by the state or any of its political subdivisions.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-98

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-99.
Contracts with political subdivisions.

The authority may contract with any political subdivision of this state which is authorized by Code Section 46-4-100 to make such contracts for the payment of such rates, tolls, fees, and charges as may be prescribed by the authority for the use by such subdivisions or the residents thereof of the services, projects, and facilities of the authority, including the purchase of gas supply planning and development services. Any such political subdivision shall have the right and power, by resolution of its governing body, to make such a contract; and the amounts contracted to be paid by such political subdivision to the authority under such a contract shall constitute general obligations of such political subdivision for the payment of which the full faith and credit of such political subdivision may be pledged to provide the funds required to fulfill all obligations arising under any such contract.

Any such political subdivision which enters into such a contract pursuant to this article shall, annually in each and every fiscal year during the term of such contract, include in a general revenue or appropriation measure, whether or not any other items are included, sums sufficient to satisfy the payments required to be made in each year by such contract until all payments required under such contract have been paid in full.

If for any reason a provision or appropriation pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section is not made, then the fiscal officers of such political subdivision are authorized and directed to set up as an appropriation on their accounts in each fiscal year the amounts required to pay the obligations called for under any such contract. The amount of an appropriation made under this subsection in each fiscal year shall be due and payable and shall be expended for the purpose of paying and meeting the obligations provided under the terms and conditions of such contract; and such appropriation shall have the same legal status as if the contracting political subdivision had included the amount of the appropriation in its general revenue or appropriation measure. Such fiscal officers shall make such payment to the authority if for any reason such appropriation is not otherwise made.

Any contract entered into pursuant to this Code section may provide for the purchase of gas from one or more projects or from a system and may provide for all of the gas requirements of the political subdivision’s municipal gas system or for a portion of such requirements or may provide for the purchase by the political subdivision of a specified portion of the output or volume of a particular project.

Any such contract may provide that the political subdivision is obligated to make payments, whether or not a project is completed, operable, or operating; whether or not the output, volume, capacity, or service of a project is suspended, interrupted, interfered with, reduced, or curtailed; whether or not the gas or services contracted for are furnished, made available, or delivered; and regardless of the performance or nonperformance of the authority or another political subdivision under the contract or any other instrument.

Any such contract may provide that if another political subdivision or other person defaults in the payment of its obligations, then the political subdivision that is party to such contract is required to pay for, is entitled to, and may use or otherwise dispose of its proportionate share of the output that was to be purchased by the defaulting political subdivision or other person.

Loans made to a political subdivision pursuant to Code Section 46-4-101 shall be for use in the municipal gas system of such political subdivision, and such loan shall be made and repaid, with interest, on such terms as the authority and political subdivision shall agree.

Any such contract may obligate the political subdivision to pay such amounts as the authority may determine as necessary or desirable to establish reserves for rate stabilization purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-99

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 46.

46-4-100.
Applicability of article to entities with gas distribution systems.

The political subdivisions with which the authority shall be authorized to contract to provide a gas supply pursuant to this article shall be those political subdivisions of this state which own and operate a gas distribution system.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-101.
Enabling resolution; issuance of revenue bonds; petition for judicial validation; fees; federal tax implications.

When the authority desires to issue revenue bonds as permitted by this article, the authority shall, prior to the adoption of a resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, enter into one or more contracts with no less than five political subdivisions which are authorized to contract with the authority in accordance with Code Section 46-4-100. All such contracts shall be in accordance with Code Section 46-4-99.

The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, equipping, alteration, repair, or extension of any project, and the issuance, in anticipation of the collection of the revenues from such project, of bonds to provide funds to pay the cost thereof, may be authorized under this article by resolution of the authority. Unless otherwise provided therein, such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted. The authority, in determining such cost, may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of the bonds; all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses; the interest which it is estimated will accrue during the construction period and during such additional period as the authority may determine on money borrowed, or which it is estimated will be borrowed pursuant to this article; and all costs included in the definition of “cost of project” as defined in Code Section 46-4-81. Such bonds may also be issued to pay off, refund, or refinance any outstanding bonds or other obligations of any nature owed by the authority, whether or not such bonds or other obligations shall then be subject to redemption; and the authority may provide for such arrangements as it may determine for the payment and security of the bonds being issued or for the payment and security of the bonds or other obligations to be paid off, refunded, or refinanced. Such bonds may also be issued for the purpose of loaning the proceeds thereof to political subdivisions for use in their municipal gas systems and to finance any other corporate purposes of the authority.

Revenue bonds may be issued under this article in one or more series; may bear such date or dates; may mature at such time or times, not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates; may bear interest at such rate or rates, that may be fixed or may vary in accordance with a specified formula or method of determination, payable at such time or times; may be payable in such medium of payment at such place or places; may be in such denomination or denominations; may be in such form, either coupon or fully registered without coupons; may be issued in any specific amounts; may carry such registration, conversion, and exchangeability privileges; may be declared or become due before the maturity date thereof; may provide such call or redemption privileges; may have such rank or priority; and may contain such other terms, covenants, assignments, and conditions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide. The authority may sell such bonds in such manner, at such price or prices, and upon such terms and conditions as shall be determined by the authority. The authority may arrange for insurance contracts, surety bonds, letters of credit, lines of credit, commitments to purchase, or other liquidity or credit support mechanisms and may remarket bonds to provide security to assure timely payment of bonds. The authority may by resolution delegate to such officers, employees, or agents as the authority’s members may select the power to authorize the issuance and sale of bonds and fix, within limits prescribed in the resolution, the time and manner of their sale, maturities, date or rates of interest, and other terms and conditions the officer, employee, or agent considers appropriate.

The bonds shall be signed by the chairman or other authorized officers of the authority; the corporate seal of the authority shall be impressed, imprinted, or otherwise reproduced on the bonds; and the bonds shall be attested by the signature of the secretary-treasurer or assistant secretary-treasurer of the authority. The coupons, if any, shall be signed in such manner as may be directed by the authority. The signatures of the officers of the authority and the seal of the authority upon any bond, note, or other debt security issued by the authority may be by facsimile if the instrument is authenticated or countersigned by a trustee or other authenticating agent other than the authority itself or an officer or employee of the authority. All bonds or notes issued under authority of this article bearing signatures or facsimiles of the signatures of officers of the authority in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor such officers whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be officers of the authority. Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, interim receipts, in such form and with such provisions as the authority may determine, may be issued to the purchasers of bonds to be issued under this article.

Any bond resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds and any indenture or trust agreement entered into under this article to finance in whole or in part the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, equipment, alteration, repair, or extension of any project may contain covenants as to:

The rates, fees, tolls, or charges to be charged for the services, facilities, and commodities of the project or system;

The use and disposition of the revenue to be derived from the project or system;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation, use, and disposition thereof, including debt service reserve; renewal and replacement or other capital improvement reserve, including reserves for the provision of fuel; and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by the bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to which the issuance of such bonds may be authorized;

The purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of said bonds may be applied, and the use and disposition of such proceeds;

Events of default and the rights and liabilities arising thereupon, the terms and conditions upon which bonds issued under this article shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

The issuance of other additional bonds or instruments payable from or a charge against the revenue of such project or system;

The insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds;

Books of account and inspection and audit thereof;

Limitations or restrictions on the power to lease or otherwise dispose of the project while any of the bonds or interest thereon remains outstanding and unpaid; and

The operation and maintenance of the project or system, and of the authority.

The provisions of this article and of any bond resolution, indenture, or trust agreement entered into pursuant to this article shall be a contract with every holder of the bonds; and the duties of the authority under this article and under any such bond resolution, indenture, or trust agreement shall be enforceable by any bondholder by mandamus or other appropriate action or proceeding at law or in equity.

The authority shall give notice to the district attorney of the Atlanta Judicial Circuit of its intention to issue its revenue bonds, setting forth the fact of service of such notice, the principal amount of bonds to be issued, the purpose for which the same are to be issued, whether the bonds are to be issued in separate series or installments from time to time, the interest rate or rates which such bonds are to bear, the amount of principal to be paid in each year during the life of the bonds or the method or formula by which such amounts shall be determined, the date by which all bonds are to be paid in full, and the security to be pledged to the payment of the bond; provided, however, that such notice, in the discretion of the authority, in lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which the bonds are to bear, may state that the bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest specified in the notice or the maximum rate permitted, at any time, by law, or, in the event the bonds, or any series or installment thereof, are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, may state that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the notice; provided, further, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell the bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in the notice to the district attorney. Such notice shall be signed by the chairman, vice chairman, or secretary-treasurer.

Within 20 days after the date of service of the required notice, the district attorney shall prepare and file in the office of the clerk of the Superior Court of Fulton County a complaint directed to the Superior Court of Fulton County in the name of the state and against the authority, setting forth the fact of service of such notice, the amount of the bonds to be issued, for what purpose they are to be issued, whether the bonds are to be issued in separate series or installments from time to time, the interest rate or rates they are to bear or the maximum rate or rates of interest, the amount of principal and interest to be paid annually or the method or formula by which the amount of such payments shall be determined, and the date by which all bonds are to be paid in full. In addition, the district attorney shall obtain from the judge of the court an order requiring the authority by its proper officers to appear at such time and place as the judge may direct, either during a session of court or in chambers, within 20 days after the filing of the complaint, and show cause, if any, why the bonds should not be confirmed and validated. Such complaint and order shall be served upon the authority in the manner provided by law; and to such complaint the authority shall make sworn answer at or before the date set in the order for the hearing.

Prior to the hearing of the cause, the clerk of the Superior Court of Fulton County shall publish in the official organ of Fulton County once during each of the two weeks immediately preceding the week in which the hearing is to be held a notice to the public that, on the day specified in the order providing for the hearing of the cause, the same will be heard.

Within the time prescribed in the order or at such other time as he may fix, the judge of the superior court shall proceed to hear and determine all questions of law and of fact in the cause, including the question of whether the contractual obligations which are made a condition precedent to the issuance of such bonds by subsection (a) of this Code section have been properly incurred; and the judge shall render judgment on the cause. Any citizen of this state may become a party to the proceedings at or before the time set for the hearing. Any party who is dissatisfied with the judgment of the court confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor or refusing to confirm and validate the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor may appeal from the judgment under the procedure provided by Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 5. No appeal may be taken by any person who was not a party at the time the judgment appealed from was rendered.

In the event no appeal is filed within 30 days after the date of the judgment of validation, or, if an appeal is filed, in the event the judgment is affirmed on appeal, the judgment of the superior court so confirming and validating the issuance of the bonds and the security therefor shall be forever conclusive upon the validity of the bonds and the security therefor.

Bonds issued under this article shall bear a certificate of validation signed with the facsimile or manually executed signature of the clerk of the Superior Court of Fulton County stating the date on which the bonds were validated as provided in this Code section; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state.

The authority shall reimburse the district attorney for his actual costs of the case, if any. For every $5,000.00 in principal amount of bonds or portion thereof, there shall be payable to the clerk of the Superior Court of Fulton County the following fees for validation and confirmation:

Click to view

Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, this article shall govern all civil claims, proceedings, and actions respecting debt of the authority evidenced by revenue bonds.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the authority from issuing bonds, the interest on which is includable in gross income of the owners thereof for federal income tax purposes.

First $500,000.00 $1.00 $501,000.00 — $2,500,000.00 .25 All over $2,500,000.00 .10

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 46.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to §

28-9-5

, in 1987, “obligations” was substituted for “obligation” near the beginning of the fourth sentence in subsection (b); and, in subsection (c), “exchangeability” was substituted for “exchangibility” in the first sentence and commas were inserted following “to purchase” in the third sentence and “rates of interest” in the last sentence.

Pursuant to §

28-9-5

, in 1988, “bondholder” was substituted for “bond holder” near the end of subsection (f) and “the” was added preceding “two weeks” near the middle of subsection (i).

46-4-102.
Necessary parties to revenue bonds validation petition; intervention by citizens; adjudication.

When payments which are made by political subdivisions pursuant to contracts entered into under subsection (a) of Code Section 46-4-99 are pledged as security for the payment of bonds sought to be validated, the petition for validation shall make party defendant the authority and shall also make parties defendant to such action every political subdivision which has contracted with the authority for the use of the facilities, commodities, and services of the project, if any, for which bonds shall be sought to be validated and issued. In addition, where the bonds are to be issued to finance a project, every other party, whether public or private, contracting with the authority in any manner with relation to the operation of such project, and particularly with relation to any common ownership of such project or to the supplying of gas to the authority or the taking or purchasing of gas from the project, shall be made parties defendant.

All such parties defendant shall be served and shall be required to show cause, if any exists, why such contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by the court and the validity of the terms thereof determined and the matters and conditions imposed on the parties to such contracts and all such undertakings thereof adjudicated to be valid and binding on the parties thereto.

Notice of such proceedings shall be included in the notice of validation hearing required by subsection (i) of Code Section 46-4-101 to be issued and published by the clerk of the Superior Court of Fulton County. In addition to such notice required to be published in Fulton County, such notice shall also be published in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the State of Georgia, once a week during each of the two weeks immediately preceding the week of the hearing.

Any citizen resident of this state may, at or before the time set for the validation hearing, intervene in the validation proceedings conducted in the Superior Court of Fulton County pursuant to Code Section 46-4-101 and may assert any ground or objection to the validity and binding effect of such contract on his own behalf and on behalf of any political subdivision and of all citizens, residents, and property owners of the state.

No appeal may be taken by any person who was not a party at the time the judgment appealed from was rendered.

An adjudication as to the validity of any such contract which adjudication is unexcepted to within 30 days after the date of the judgment of validation or, if an appeal is filed, which adjudication is confirmed on appeal shall be forever conclusive and binding upon such political subdivisions and the resident citizens and property owners of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-103.
Failure of district attorney to file revenue bonds validation petition.

In all cases where the authority has adopted a resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds, and where notice has been duly served upon the district attorney for the purpose of securing a judicial validation of such bonds and the security therefor, and where, in such case, there has been a failure on the part of such district attorney or other officer to proceed within the time prescribed by this article, it shall be competent for the authority to represent such facts in writing to the court and to represent further that such failure has been without fault on the part of the authority. In such case, the Superior Court of Fulton County shall have power and authority to inquire into the facts; and, upon being satisfied that such failure has not arisen from any fault or neglect on the part of the authority, it shall be the duty of the court to pass an order directing such district attorney to proceed within ten days to file a complaint as authorized by this article. Thereafter, the proceedings shall be held in the same manner as would have been followed had such petition been duly and promptly filed in the first instance.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-104.
Bonds as legal investments.

The bonds authorized by this article shall be securities in which:

All public officers and bodies of this state;

All political subdivisions of this state;

All insurance companies and associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business;

All banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business;

All administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and

All other persons whatsoever who are authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state

may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds shall also be securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and its political subdivisions for any purpose for which deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is authorized.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-105.
Pledge of revenue to retire bonds.

All or any part of the gross or net revenues and earnings derived from any particular project or system and any and all revenues and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether such revenues and earnings were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, may be pledged by the authority to the payment of the principal of and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as may be provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in any trust instrument pertaining to such bonds.

Such funds so pledged, from whatever source received, may include funds received from one or more or all sources and may be set aside at regular intervals into sinking funds for which provision may be made in any such resolution or trust instrument, which sinking funds may be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall become due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall mature;

The necessary charges of any trustee, paying agent, or registrar for such bonds; and

Any premium upon bonds retired upon call or purchase.

The use and disposition of any sinking fund may be subject to regulations for which provision may be made in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust instrument or indenture securing the payment of the same.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-106.
Trust agreement or indenture to secure bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of revenue bonds may be secured by a trust agreement or indenture made by the authority with a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company inside or outside this state. Such trust agreement or indenture may pledge or assign any or all revenue, receipts, and earnings to be received by the authority and any proceeds which may be derived from the disposition of any real or personal property of the authority or proceeds of insurance carried thereon.

The resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds and such trust agreement or indenture may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bond owners, including the right of appointment of a receiver upon default in the payment of any principal or interest obligation and the right of any receiver or trustee to enforce collection of any rates, fees, tolls, charges, or revenues for the use of the services or facilities of the project or system necessary to pay all costs of operation and all reserves provided for, the principal of and interest on all bonds in the issue, all costs of collection, and all other costs reasonably necessary to accomplish the collection of such sums in the event of any default of the authority.

Such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture may include covenants setting forth the duties of the authority regarding the acquisition of property for and the construction of the project and regarding the custody, safeguarding, and application of all funds of the authority, including any proceeds derived from the disposition of any real or personal property of the authority or proceeds of insurance carried thereon. In addition, such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture may include covenants providing for the operation, maintenance, repair, and insurance of the project and may contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional bonds may be issued.

Such resolution, trust agreement, or indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bond owners and of the trustee; may restrict the individual right of action of any bond owner in such manner as is customary in securing bonds and debentures of corporations; and may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bond owners.

All expenses incurred in carrying out any trust agreement or indenture under this Code section may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by such trust agreement or indenture.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-107.
Proceeds of bonds.

Proceeds of the bonds issued under authority of this article shall be used solely for the purpose of financing corporate purposes of the authority, including the payment of the cost of projects and the loaning of proceeds to political subdivisions, and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of such person and under such restrictions as the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or the trust agreement or indenture may provide.

If the proceeds of such bonds, including all series or installments of such issue, by error of calculation or otherwise, are less than the cost of projects or the cost of other purposes financed thereby, then, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement or indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued, subject to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-4-101 to provide the amount of such deficit. Unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement or indenture, such additional bonds shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund, without preference or priority, as the bonds first issued for the same purpose.

If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such bonds are issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue or series or installment of such issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more projects.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-108.
Lost, stolen, or mutilated bond certificates.

If any bond becomes mutilated or is lost, stolen, or destroyed, the authority may execute and deliver, and the trustee may authenticate, a new bond of like date of issue, maturity date, principal amount, and interest rate per annum as the bond so mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed; which new bond shall have the same provisions in all respects as those on the bond mutilated, lost, stolen, or destroyed, provided that:

In the case of any mutilated bond, such bond is first surrendered to the authority or to the trustee;

In the case of any lost, stolen, or destroyed bond, there is first furnished evidence of such loss, theft, or destruction satisfactory to the authority and the trustee, together with indemnity satisfactory to the authority and the trustee;

All other reasonable requirements of the authority and the trustee are complied with; and

Expenses in connection with such transaction are paid.

Any bonds surrendered for exchange shall be canceled.

The authority shall be authorized to print the new bond with the validation certificate bearing the facsimile signature of the clerk of the superior court then in office, and such certificate shall have the same force and effect as in the first instance. All responsibility with respect to the issuance of any such new bonds shall be with the authority and not with such clerk; and such clerk shall have no liability in the event an overissuance occurs.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-108

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-109.
Interest on bonds after due date.

Interest shall cease to accrue on any bond on the date that such bond becomes due for payment if said payment is made or duly provided for, but liability for such bond and for the accrued interest thereon shall continue until such bond is 20 years overdue for payment. At that time, unless demand for payment has been made, such obligation shall be extinguished and shall be deemed no longer outstanding.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-109

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-110.
Cancellation or destruction of retired bonds.

Unless otherwise directed by the authority, every evidence of indebtedness and interest coupon paid or otherwise retired shall forthwith be marked “canceled” and shall be delivered by the paying agent making payment thereof to the authority, whereupon the evidence of indebtedness or the interest coupon shall be destroyed and a certificate of destruction shall be filed in the records of the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-111.
Records of bond and note transactions required.

The fiscal officer of the authority or his agent shall maintain records containing a full and correct description of each evidence of indebtedness issued, identifying it and showing its date, issue, amount, interest rate, payment dates, payments made, registration, cancellation, destruction, and every other relevant transaction.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-111

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-112.
Paying agents.

The authority may appoint one or more paying agents for each issue or series or installment of bonds. Every such paying agent shall be an incorporated bank or trust company authorized by the laws of the United States or of the state in which it is located to do a banking or trust business. The authority may make such provisions respecting paying agents as it deems necessary or useful and may enter into a contract with any paying agents containing such terms, including its compensation, and such conditions in regard to the paying agents as the authority deems necessary or useful.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-112

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-113.
Bond anticipation notes.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in Code Section 46-4-101, to issue from time to time its negotiable notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, regardless of whether the notes to be renewed have matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds.

Any resolution authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds.

All notes shall be general obligations of the authority, payable out of any of its funds or revenues, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations then outstanding, provided that there may be specially pledged to the payment of such notes the proceeds to be derived from the issuance of the validated bonds in anticipation of the issuance of which the notes have been issued.

Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of such notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated.

Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-113

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.

46-4-114.
Negotiability of bonds.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, every evidence of indebtedness issued under this article shall have all the rights and incidences of negotiable instruments, subject to provisions for registration.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-114

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 745, § 1.